New Jersey, session 222, A2517.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2017, c.197 (C.54A:9-25.44) is amended to read as follows: 1. a. There is established in the Department of the Treasury a special fund to be known as the "Jersey Fresh Program Fund." b.    (1)  Each taxpayer shall have the opportunity to indicate on the taxpayer's New Jersey gross income tax return that a portion of the taxpayer's tax refund or an enclosed contribution shall be deposited in the special fund. (2)  The State Treasurer shall annually deposit into the Jersey Fresh Program Fund an amount equal to the revenues generated from the alcoholic beverage excise tax, R.S.54:43-1, at the rate of $0.21875 per gallon of wines, vermouth, and sparkling wines sold by plenary winery and farm winery licensees pursuant to R.S.33:1-10. c.    Any costs incurred by the Division of Taxation for collection or administration attributable to paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section may be deducted from receipts collected pursuant to this section, as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  The State Treasurer shall deposit net contributions collected pursuant to [this act] paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section into the "Jersey Fresh Program Fund." d.    The Legislature shall annually appropriate all funds deposited in the "Jersey Fresh Program Fund" established pursuant to this section to the Department of Agriculture for the purposes of providing support to the Jersey Fresh Program, which shall include, but need not be limited to, funding advertising, promotional, and quality grading program activities to inform consumers about the availability of locally grown agricultural products. e.    As used in this section, "Jersey Fresh Program" means Jersey Fresh for fruits and vegetables, Jersey Grown for nursery crops, Jersey Seafood for aquacultured and wild-caught fish and shellfish, Jersey Equine for equine livestock, and Made with Jersey Fresh for processed food made with New Jersey sourced agricultural products. (cf: P.L.2017, c.197, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.